test/src/morphology/N-oksh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - okš: # Noun 68 'eng /est karu/fin' - full paradigm
     okš+N+Sg+Nom: okš
     okš+N+Sg+Gen: okš
     okš+N+Sg+Par: okšõ
     okš+N+Sg+Dat: okšõn
     okš+N+Sg+Ins: okšõks
     okš+N+Sg+Ill: okšõ
     okš+N+Sg+Ela: okšõst
     okš+N+Pl+Nom: okšīd
     okš+N+Pl+Gen: okšīd
     okš+N+Pl+Par: okšīdi
     okš+N+Pl+Dat: okšīdõn
     okš+N+Pl+Ins: okšīdõks
     okš+N+Pl+Ill: okšīz
     okš+N+Pl+Ela: okšīst
